Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.20, as


amended by Section 21, Chapter 126, O.S.L. 2023 (17 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 160.20), is amended to read as follows:


Section 160.20. A. After August 21, 2015, no wind energy


facility may be constructed if the base of any tower is located at a


distance of less than:


1. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from the center line


of any runway located on:


a. a public-use airport as defined in Section 120.2 of


Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or


b. an airport owned by a municipality;

Req. No. 588 Page 1


2. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from any public


school which is a part of a public school district; or


3. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from a hospital.


B. The setback distances prescribed in paragraphs 2 and 3 of


subsection A of this section may be waived by a majority vote of the


applicable school board or by a hospital board of directors or other


governing body. Any approved waiver shall be submitted in writing,


signed by all parties, by the wind energy facility operator to the


Corporation Commission.


C. Attestation of compliance with the setback requirements in


this section shall be included in any reports required by the


Corporation Commission. Stakeholder and landowner disputes arising


under subsection A or B of this section shall fall under the


exclusive jurisdiction of the district courts. The Corporation


Commission may seek enforcement of the submission and attestation


requirements of this subsection and subsection C D of this section


through its administrative court system.


C. D. After April 3, 2018, construction or operation of a


proposed individual wind turbine or any other individual structure


requiring a Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) Form 7460-1 that


is part of a wind energy facility shall not encroach upon or


otherwise have a significant adverse impact on the mission, training


or operations of any military installation or branch of military as


determined by the Military Aviation and Installation Assurance

Req. No. 588 Page 2


Siting Clearinghouse (Clearinghouse) and the FAA. Areas of impact


include, but are not limited to, military training routes, drop


zones, approaches to runways and bombing ranges. No individual wind


turbine or any other individual structure that requires a an FAA


7460-1 form that is part of a wind energy facility may be


constructed or expanded unless there is an active Determination of


No Hazard from the FAA and adverse impacts to the United States


Department of Defense, pursuant to Title 32 of the Code of Federal


Regulations, Section 211.6, have been resolved as evidenced by


documentation from the Clearinghouse for the individual wind turbine


or other individual structure. The Mission Compatibility


Certification Letter or successor form may serve as such evidence of


adverse impacts being resolved with the Department of Defense or


successor agency.


1. The Determination of No Hazard and documentation of the


resolution of adverse impacts to the Department of Defense shall be


filed with the Corporation Commission and the Oklahoma Department of


Aerospace and Aeronautics.


2. The requirements established by this subsection shall not


prohibit the construction of an individual wind turbine or any other


individual structure requiring a an FAA 7460-1 form that is part of


a wind energy facility if that individual wind turbine or other


individual structure has received a Determination of No Hazard or


mitigation plan on or before April 3, 2018.

Req. No. 588 Page 3


3. The Corporation Commission is authorized to promulgate rules


and regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this


section and Section 160.21 of this title.


D. E. If an owner of a wind energy facility fails to submit an


active Determination of No Hazard and documentation that adverse


impacts to the Department of Defense have been resolved by the


Clearinghouse for the individual wind turbine or other individual


structure prior to the start of construction, the owner shall be


subject to an administrative penalty not to exceed One Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per day, per violation from the


Corporation Commission as provided by law. In addition,


stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Corporation


Commission or the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics


may institute an action in any court of general jurisdiction to


prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of subsection C D


of this section other than Corporation Commission actions related to


submissions or attestations.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-588 RD 1/16/2025 2:23:08 PM

Req. No. 588 Page 4